District of Columbia statutes.
39-117

DCPL Revenue-Generating Activities Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the DCPL Revenue-Generating Activities Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Board in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from revenue-generating activities and services described in § 39-105(a)(14).

(c)

The Fund shall be used for the following purposes:

(1)

Payment of any expenses associated with activities and services described in §  39-105(a)(14), including expenses for space rental and special events associated with the activities and services authorized in §  39-105(a)(14); and

(2)

Payment of any non-personnel costs related to the library services mission of the District of Columbia Public Library.

June 3, 1896, 29 Stat. 244, ch. 315, § 15 [17]
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4112(b), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4112(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-36: Section 4113 of D.C. Law 21-36 provided that section 4112 of the act shall apply as of March 25, 2015.